Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. In General

§ 26-3-101.
Certificate of authority required.

No person shall act as an insurer and no insurer shall transact insurance in this state unless authorized by a subsisting certificate of authority granted by the commissioner, except as to transactions expressly otherwise provided in this code [title 26].

No insurer shall solicit insurance applications or otherwise transact insurance in another state or country, from offices or by personnel located in this state, unless it holds a subsisting certificate of authority granted by the commissioner authorizing it to transact the same kinds of insurance in this state.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 67, § 24; 1884, ch. 48, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 626; R.S. 1899, § 3176; C.S. 1910, § 4124; C.S. 1920, § 5268; R.S. 1931, § 57-426; C.S. 1945, § 52-1027; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-20, 26.1-50; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 50; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-105

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

For case construing repealed provision

requiring certificate of authority, see State ex rel. Coddington v. Loucks, 30 Wyo. 485, 222 P. 37,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1924).

Quoted

in

Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 26-3-102.
When certificate not required.

A certificate of authority is not required of an insurer for:

Investigation, settlement or litigation of claims under its policies lawfully written in this state, or liquidation of its assets and liabilities, other than collection of new premiums, all resulting from its authorized operations in this state;

Transactions thereunder subsequent to issuance of a policy covering only subjects of insurance not resident, located or expressly to be performed in this state at time of issuance and lawfully solicited, written and delivered outside this state;

Transactions pursuant to coverages lawfully written under chapter 11 of this code;

Reinsurance, except as to domestic reinsurers.

An insurer not transacting new insurance business in Wyoming but continuing collection of premiums on and servicing policies remaining in force as to residents of or risks located in Wyoming is transacting insurance in Wyoming for the purpose of premium tax requirements only and is not required to have a certificate of authority. This subsection does not apply to insurers which withdrew from Wyoming prior to May 21, 1955.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 51; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-51; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-106

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2.

The 2012 amendment,

deleted “surplus lines” after “pursuant to” in (a)(iii).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

Quoted

in

Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 26-3-103.
General qualifications for authority to transact business.

To transact insurance in this state an insurer shall be in compliance with this code [title 26], and its charter powers and shall be an incorporated stock insurer, an incorporated mutual insurer or a reciprocal insurer of the same general type as may be formed as a domestic insurer under this code.

No foreign insurer shall be authorized to transact insurance or business on the mutual assessment plan, stipulated premium plan or any similar plan in this state if that insurer does not maintain reserves as required by chapter 6 of this code as applicable to the kinds of insurance or business transacted, wherever transacted in the United States. This prohibition does not apply to mutual or reciprocal insurers doing business on the cash premium plan but providing for contingent liability of policyholders or subscribers.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 52; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-52; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-3-104.
Insurers not qualified to transact business in state; credit and investigation reports.

No foreign insurer owned or controlled in any manner or degree by any government or governmental agency shall be authorized to transact insurance in Wyoming. Membership in a mutual insurer, or subscribership in a reciprocal insurer, or ownership of stock of an insurer by the alien property custodian or similar official of the United States, or ownership of stock or other security which does not have voting rights with respect to the insurer’s management, or supervision of an insurer by public authority, is not ownership or control of the insurer for the purposes of this subsection.

The commissioner shall not grant or continue authority to transact insurance in this state as to any insurer the management of which, after investigation or upon reliable information, he finds:

Is incompetent or untrustworthy;

So lacking in insurance company managerial experience as to make a proposed operation hazardous to the insurance-buying public; or

Is affiliated through ownership, control reinsurance or other insurance or business relations with any person whose business operations are or have been marked by manipulation of assets, accounts or reinsurance, or by bad faith.

Before granting a certificate of authority to a new domestic insurer, the commissioner shall secure a credit and investigation report as to the insurer’s management personnel and directors from a recognized and established independent investigation and reporting agency. The commissioner may secure a similar report relative to the management of any other insurer at any time he deems advisable.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 53; W.S. 1957, 26.1-53; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-108

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-3-105.
Qualification of new foreign insurers.

No foreign insurer is authorized to transact insurance in Wyoming if that insurer has not been issuing its own policies as an authorized insurer for at least two (2) years, unless the insurer is otherwise qualified for a certificate of authority under this code and is:

The wholly owned subsidiary or affiliate of an insurer which is already an authorized insurer in Wyoming and the subsidiary or affiliate shares common management and business operations with the insurer;

The successor in interest through statutory merger or statutory consolidation, or through bulk reinsurance of substantially all of the insurance risks in this state, of an authorized insurer; or

An insurer seeking authority to write a line of insurance for which, in the commissioner’s opinion:

Adequate provision is not made by insurers already authorized in this state; or

Adequate competition between insurers does not exist in this state.

No foreign insurer shall continue to hold a certificate of authority under W.S.

26-3-114

if the insurer has reinsured substantially all of its insurance risks either prior to, contemporaneously with or after being acquired by another insurer not holding a subsisting certificate of authority in this state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 54; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-54; Laws 1977, ch. 131, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-109

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2018 ch. 21, § 1, effective March 9, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), deleted “in its state or country of domicile” following “two (2) years”; in (a)(i), inserted “or affiliate” following “owned subsidiary” and added “and the subsidiary or affiliate shares common management and business operations with the insurer” at the end; in (a)(iii), substituted “insurer seeking authority to write a line of insurance for which” for “insurer organized solely for the purpose of insuring against earthquake, flood, nuclear radiation, war or other special hazards to property or liability for which”; redesignated the former ending text of (a)(iii) as (a)(iii)(A); added (a)(iii)(B); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2018, ch. 21, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

§ 26-3-106.
Conflict of names prohibited.

No insurer shall be formed or authorized to transact insurance in this state if that insurer has or uses a name which:

Is the same as or deceptively similar to that of another insurer already authorized;

In the case of a life insurer is deceptively similar to that of another insurer authorized to transact insurance in this state within the immediately preceding ten (10) years, if life insurance policies originally issued by the other insurer are still outstanding in this state;

Is the same as or deceptively similar to the name of any foreign insurer not so authorized if the foreign insurer has within the immediately preceding twelve (12) months signified its intention to secure an incorporation in this state under that name or to do business as a foreign insurer in this state under that name by filing notice of intention with the commissioner, unless the foreign insurer gives written consent to the use of the name or deceptively similar name; or

Tends to deceive or mislead as to the insurer’s type of organization.

In case of conflict of names between two (2) insurers, or a conflict otherwise prohibited under this section, the commissioner may permit, or shall require as a condition to the issuance of an original certificate of authority to an applicant insurer, the insurer to use in this state a modified name as may reasonably be necessary to avoid the conflict.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 64, § 19; R.S. 1887, § 621; R.S. 1899, § 3173; C.S. 1910, § 4119; C.S. 1920, § 5263; R.S. 1931, § 57-421; C.S. 1945, § 52-1021; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-9, 26.1-55; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 55; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-110

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-3-107.
Insurer may be authorized to transact combination of kinds of insurance; exceptions.

A qualified insurer may be authorized to transact one (1) or more kinds of insurance as defined in chapter 5 of this code [title 26], except:

A life insurer may grant annuities and may be authorized to transact disability insurance, except that the commissioner may continue to authorize any qualified life insurer which immediately prior to January 1, 1968 was lawfully authorized to transact in this state any kinds of insurance in addition to life and disability insurances and annuity business;

A reciprocal insurer shall not transact life insurance;

A title insurer shall be a stock insurer and shall not transact any other kind of insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 56; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-56; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-111

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-3-108.
Capital and surplus requirements.

To qualify for authority to transact any kind of insurance as defined in chapter 5 or combination of kinds of insurance as specified in this subsection, a foreign insurer, or a domestic stock insurer applying for its original certificate of authority, shall possess and thereafter maintain unimpaired basic paid-in capital stock and surplus, if a stock insurer, or unimpaired basic surplus, if a foreign mutual insurer or foreign reciprocal insurer, in an amount not less than as follows:

Kind or kinds Stock Insurers Foreign Mutual Insurers Foreign Reciprocal Insurers of Insurance Capital Stock Surplus Surplus Surplus Life $1,000,000. $ 500,000. $1,500,000. Disability 1,000,000. 500,000. 1,500,000. $1,500,000. Life & disability 1,000,000. 1,000,000. 2,000,000. Property 1,000,000. 1,000,000. 2,000,000. 2,000,000. CasualtyExcluding Surety 1,000,000. 1,000,000. 2,000,000. 2,000,000. IncludingSurety 1,000,000. 1,500,000. 2,500,000. 2,500,000. Marine &Transportation 1,000,000. 1,000,000. 2,000,000. 2,000,000. Multiple line(Property andany additionalkind) 2,000,000. 2,000,000. 4,000,000. 4,000,000. Title 500,000. 250,000.

Click to view

Capital and surplus requirements are based upon all the kinds of insurance the insurer transacts in any areas in which it operates or proposes to operate, whether or not only a portion of the kinds are to be transacted in Wyoming.

As to surplus required for qualification to transact one (1) or more kinds of insurance and thereafter to be maintained, domestic mutual insurers are governed by chapter 24 of this code [title 26] and domestic reciprocal insurers are governed by chapter 27 of this code.

The commissioner may require additional capital and surplus above the minimum capital and surplus requirements set forth in this section, or any other section of this code based upon the type, volume and nature of the insurance business transacted.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 56, § 3; p. 66, § 23; 1884, ch. 48, §§ 3, 5; R.S. 1887, §§ 605, 625; R.S. 1899, §§ 3157, 3178; C.S. 1910, §§ 4103, 4122; Laws 1915, ch. 31, § 1; 1917, ch. 92, § 3; C.S. 1920, §§ 5245, 5266; Laws 1925, ch. 147, § 2; 1931, ch. 16, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 57-403, 57-424; C.S. 1945, §§ 52-1003, 52-1025; Laws 1949, ch. 63, § 1; 1953, ch. 186, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-11, 26-19, 26.1-57; Laws 1961, ch. 72, § 1; 1967, ch. 136, § 57; 1977, ch. 131, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-112

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1985, ch. 38, § 1; 1992, ch. 59, § 2.

For cases construing similar statute,

now repealed, see Edwards v. Johnston, 23 Wyo. 384, 152 P. 273,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1915); Farmers Auto. Inter-Insurance Exch. v. MacDonald, 59 Wyo. 352, 140 P.2d 905,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1943).

§ 26-3-109.
Delayed compliance with capital and surplus requirements.

A domestic or foreign insurer holding a valid certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state as of April 1, 1985, may continue to transact the kinds of insurance permitted by the certificate of authority by complying with this code and by maintaining unimpaired not less than the same amount of paid-in capital stock or paid-in capital stock and surplus, if a stock insurer, or not less than the same amount of surplus, if a mutual insurer, as required under the laws of this state for that authority immediately prior to that date, and as if the laws had continued in force.

An insurer specified in subsection (a) of this section shall not be granted authority to transact any other or additional kinds of insurance unless it then fully complies with the capital and surplus requirements applied to all the kinds of insurance it then proposes to transact, as provided under W.S.

26-3-108

as to new domestic insurers.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 58; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-58; Laws 1977, ch. 131, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-113

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1985, ch. 38, § 1.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 26-1-102(a)(xxxii).

§ 26-3-110.
Additional kinds of insurance authorized for certain insurers.

Without additional capital or additional surplus, an authorized insurer is also authorized:

If a life insurer, to grant annuities;

If a disability insurer, to insure against congenital defects as defined in W.S. 26-5-106(a)(xii);

If a casualty insurer, to transact also disability insurance;

If a property insurer, to include an amount and kind of insurance against legal liability for injury, damage or loss to the person or property of others, and for medical, hospital and surgical expense related to that injury, as the commissioner deems to be reasonably incidental to insurance of real property against fire and other perils under policies covering farm properties, or residential properties designed for occupancy by not more than four (4) families, with or without incidental office, professional, private school or studio occupancy by an insured, whether or not the premium or rate charged for certain perils so covered is specified in the policy.

Paragraphs (a)(iii) and (iv) of this section do not apply to domestic insurers authorized pursuant to W.S. 26-3-109(a).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 59; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-59; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-114

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-3-111.
Deposit required of insurers.

The commissioner shall not authorize an insurer to transact insurance in this state unless it makes and thereafter continuously maintains in trust in this state through the commissioner, or in another state as provided in subsection (b) of this section, for the protection of all its policyholders and creditors a deposit of cash or securities eligible for deposit under W.S.

26-8-103

of a value not less than the amount applicable to the kinds of insurance the insurer transacts as follows:

Minimum
Kind(s) of insurance
Amount of deposit
Life
$200,000.00
Disability
100,000.00
Life & disability
200,000.00
Property
100,000.00
Casualty
Excluding surety
100,000.00
Including surety
150,000.00
Multiple line
200,000.00
Hail-crop
100,000.00
Title
Domestic insurers
50,000.00
Foreign insurers
100,000.00

Click to view

As to foreign insurers, instead of the deposit or part thereof in this state, the commissioner shall accept the certificate in proper form of the public official having supervision over insurers in any other state to the effect that a like deposit or part thereof by the insurer is being maintained in public custody or control pursuant to law in the other state in trust for the protection of all its policyholders wherever located, or of all its policyholders in the United States, or all of its policyholders and creditors in the United States. All such deposits shall be in cash or securities, or both, of a quality not less than those eligible for deposit in this state under W.S.

26-8-103

.

A property insurer also writing hail-crop coverages is required to have only the deposit applicable to property insurance. Instead of the hail-crop deposit, a domestic mutual hail-crop insurer, upon the commissioner’s approval, may file with the commissioner and maintain reinsurance of all risk under all of the insurer’s hail-crop policies. The reinsurer shall be qualified for a certificate of authority as a stock property insurer under this code, and the reinsurance agreement shall provide for payment by the reinsurer of one hundred percent (100%) of all losses under hail-crop policies issued by the ceding insurer without assessment of policyholders of the ceding insurer.

All deposits in this state are subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 8 of this code [title 26].

In addition to deposits required or maintained by foreign insurers, the commissioner may require any foreign insurer to make and maintain in trust in this state, through the commissioner, a deposit of cash or securities eligible for deposit under W.S.

26-8-103

, of a value not less than an amount which the commissioner specifies, for the sole protection of an insurer’s policyholders located in this state. All additional deposits are subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 8 of this code.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 66, § 23; 1884, ch. 48, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 625; R.S. 1899, § 3178; C.S. 1910, § 4122; Laws 1917, ch. 92, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 5266; Laws 1925, ch. 147, § 2; 1931, ch. 16, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1931, § 57-424; C.S. 1945, § 52-1025; Laws 1949, ch. 63, § 1; 1953, ch. 186, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-19, 26.1-60; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 60; 1977, ch. 131, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-115

; Laws 1979, ch. 47, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-3-112.
Certificate of authority; application; contents of application.

An insurer shall apply to the commissioner for an original certificate of authority, stating under oath of the president, or vice-president or other chief officer and the secretary of the insurer, or of the attorney-in-fact if the insurer is a reciprocal insurer, the insurer’s name, location of its home office, or principal office in the United States if an alien insurer, the kinds of insurance to be transacted, date of organization or incorporation, form of organization, state or country of domicile and any additional information the commissioner reasonably requires. The application shall be accompanied by the applicable fees as provided in W.S.

26-4-101

together with the following documents, as applicable:

If a corporation, a current, complete copy of its charter or articles of incorporation currently certified by the public official with whom the originals are on file;

If a domestic incorporated insurer or a mutual insurer, a current, complete copy of its bylaws, certified by the insurer’s corporate secretary;

If a reciprocal insurer, a current, complete copy of the power of attorney of its attorney-in-fact, certified by the attorney-in-fact;

If a domestic reciprocal insurer, the declaration provided for in W.S. 26-27-107(b);

A complete copy of its financial statement as of not earlier than the December 31 immediately preceding in “convention” form, sworn to by at least two (2) executive officers of the insurer or certified by the public insurance supervisory official of the insurer’s state of domicile or of entry into the United States if an alien insurer;

A copy of the report of last examination made of the insurer as of a date within not more than the sixty (60) months immediately preceding, certified by the Wyoming insurance department or by the public insurance supervisory official of the insurer’s state of domicile or state of entry into the United States if an alien insurer;

Acceptance of the constitution of the state of Wyoming, upon a form the commissioner furnishes for that purpose;

Appointment of the commissioner pursuant to W.S.

26-3-121

as its attorney to receive service of legal process;

If a foreign insurer a certificate:

Of the public insurance supervisory official of its state or country of domicile showing that it is authorized to transact in that state or country the kinds of insurance proposed to be transacted in this state;

As to deposit if to be tendered pursuant to W.S. 26-3-111(b).

If an alien insurer, a copy of the appointment and authority of its United States manager, certified by its officer having custody of its records;

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 21, § 2.

Designation by the insurer of its officer or representative authorized to appoint and remove its agents in this state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 61; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-61; Laws 1977, ch. 131, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-116

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1987, ch. 8, § 1; 1989, ch. 58, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2018 ch. 21, §§ 1, 2, effective March 9, 2018.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “and” at the end of (a)(iii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2018 amendments.—

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 21, § 1, in (a)(vi), substituted “sixty (60) months” for “thirty-six (36) months.”

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 21, § 2, repealed former (a)(xi), which read: “If a life or disability insurer, a copy of the insurer's rate book and of each form of policy currently proposed to be issued in this state.”

Laws 2018, ch. 21, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 26-3-113.
Certificate of authority; issuance; contents; delivery; return.

If the commissioner finds that the insurer meets the certificate requirements under this code [title 26], he shall issue to the insurer a proper certificate of authority. If he finds the insurer does not meet the certificate requirements, the commissioner shall issue his order refusing the certificate. The commissioner shall act upon an application for certificate of authority within a reasonable period after its completion.

The certificate, if issued, shall specify the kinds of insurance the insurer is authorized to transact in Wyoming. At the insurer’s request the commissioner may issue a certificate of authority limited to particular types of insurance or coverages within the scope of a kind of insurance as defined in chapter 5 of this code.

Although issued and delivered to the insurer, the certificate of authority at all times is the property of this state. Upon expiration, suspension or termination of the certificate, the insurer shall promptly deliver the certificate to the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 62; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-62; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-117

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-3-114.
Certificate of authority; continuation; expiration; reinstatement.

A certificate of authority issued under this code [title 26] continues in force until suspended or revoked by the commissioner or terminated at the insurer’s request, subject to continuance by the insurer each year by:

Payment prior to March 1 of the continuation fee provided in W.S.

26-4-101

;

Filing by the insurer of its annual statement for the immediately preceding calendar year as required by W.S.

26-3-123

; and

Payment by the insurer of premium taxes for the immediately preceding calendar year as required by W.S.

26-4-103

.

If not continued, an insurer’s certificate of authority expires at midnight on May 31 immediately following the insurer’s failure to continue it in force, unless earlier revoked for failure to pay taxes as provided in W.S. 26-4-105(b). The commissioner shall promptly notify the insurer of any impending expiration of its certificate of authority.

The commissioner, upon the insurer’s request made within three (3) months after expiration, may reinstate a certificate of authority which the insurer has permitted to expire, after the insurer has:

Cured all failures which resulted in the expiration; and

Paid the reinstatement fee specified in W.S.

26-4-101

.

If an insurer fails to renew its certificate of authority within the time specified in subsection (c) of this section, another certificate shall be issued only after all requirements for an original certificate of authority in this state are fulfilled.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 63; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-63; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-118

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iii), deleted “and

26-4-104

” at the end.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 26-3-115.
Suspension, revocation of certificate of authority; mandatory grounds; hearing required.

The commissioner shall refuse to continue or shall suspend or revoke an insurer’s certificate of authority if:

That action is required by any provision of this code [title 26];

A foreign insurer and it no longer meets the capital and surplus requirements specified in W.S.

26-3-108

, or is otherwise unqualified;

A domestic insurer and it has failed to cure a capital or surplus impairment within the time the commissioner allows under this code, or is otherwise unqualified; or

The insurer’s certificate of authority to transact insurance is suspended or revoked by its state of domicile, or state of entry into the United States if an alien insurer.

Notwithstanding W.S.

16-3-113

, in case of insolvency or impairment of required capital or surplus, or suspension or revocation by another state, the commissioner shall refuse, suspend or revoke the certificate of authority without a prior hearing. In all other cases the commissioner shall refuse, suspend or revoke the certificate of authority only after a hearing, unless the insurer waives the hearing in writing.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 70, § 31; 1884, ch. 48, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 633; R.S. 1899, § 3185; C.S. 1910, § 4131; C.S. 1920, § 5275; R.S. 1931, § 57-432; C.S. 1945, § 52-1033; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-35, 26.1-64; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 64; 1977, ch. 131, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-119

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Improper to grant injunctive relief requested by commissioner until parties' obligations ascertained. —

It would be improper to grant certain injunctive relief requested by the insurance commissioner, i.e., the direct payment of the tax debt of an unknown amount for certain years, the direct report of the proportion of the premiums collected on persons, subjects or risks located or resident in Wyoming and covered by policies in which such risks are in more than one state, and the payment of fines as civil penalties, where the obligation for the payment of such taxes has not been ascertained and the companies involved have not been requested to make the designated reports or pay the taxes. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 26-3-116.
Suspension and revocation of certificate of authority; discretionary and special grounds.

The commissioner may refuse to continue or may suspend or revoke an insurer’s certificate of authority if he finds after a hearing that the insurer has:

Violated or failed to comply with any lawful order of the commissioner;

Willfully violated or failed to comply with any lawful regulation of the commissioner; or

Violated any provision of this code [title 26] other than those for violation of which suspension or revocation is mandatory.

The commissioner shall suspend or revoke an insurer’s certificate of authority on any of the following grounds if he finds after a hearing that the insurer:

Is in unsound condition, or in such condition or using any methods and practices in the conduct of its business as to render its further transaction of insurance in this state injurious to policyholders or to the public;

With such frequency as to indicate its general business practice in this state has without just cause:

Failed to pay claims arising under its policies, whether the claim is in favor of an insurer or is in favor of a third person with respect to the liability of an insured to that third person;

Delayed payment of claims; or

Compelled insureds or claimants to accept less than the amount due them, or to employ attorneys or to bring suit against the insurer or an insured to secure full payment or settlement of claims.

Is affiliated with and under the same general management, or interlocking directorate, or ownership as another insurer which transacts direct insurance in this state without having a certificate of authority therefor, except as permitted under this code;

Refuses to be examined, or if its directors, officers, employees or representatives refuse to:

Submit to examination relative to its affairs;

Produce its accounts, records and files for the commissioner’s examination when required; or

Perform any legal obligation relative to the examination.

Failed to pay any final judgment rendered against it in this state upon any policy, bond, recognizance or undertaking issued or guaranteed by it, within thirty (30) days after the judgment became final, or within thirty (30) days after dismissal of an appeal before final determination, whichever date is later.

In determining whether the continued operation of any insurer transacting insurance business in this state is hazardous or injurious to policyholders, creditors or the general public the commissioner may consider any of the following:

Adverse findings reported in financial condition and market conduct examination reports, audit reports and actuarial opinions, reports or summaries;

The National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Insurance Regulatory Information System and its other financial analysis solvency tools and reports;

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 38, § 3.

Whether the insurer has made adequate provision, according to presently accepted actuarial standards of practice, for the anticipated cash flows required by the contractual obligations and related expenses of the insurer, when considered in light of the assets held by the insurer with respect to such reserves and related actuarial items including, but not limited to, the investment earnings on such assets, and the considerations anticipated to be received and retained under such policies and contracts;

The ability of any assuming reinsurer of the insurer to perform and whether the insurer’s reinsurance program provides sufficient protection for the insurer’s remaining surplus after taking into account the insurer’s cash flow and the classes of business written and the financial condition of the assuming reinsurer;

Whether the insurer’s operating loss in the last twelve (12) month period or any shorter period of time is greater than fifty percent (50%) of the insurer’s remaining surplus as regards policyholders in excess of the minimum required. For purposes of this paragraph, “operating loss” shall include, but not be limited to net capital gain or loss, change in nonadmitted assets and cash dividends paid to shareholders;

Any affiliate’s, subsidiary’s, parent’s, obligor’s or reinsurer’s insolvency, threatened insolvency or delinquency in payment of its monetary or other obligations and which in the opinion of the commissioner may affect the solvency of the insurer;

Contingent liabilities, pledges or guaranties which either individually or collectively involve a total amount which in the opinion of the commissioner may affect the solvency of the insurer;

The delinquency of any “controlling person” of an insurer in transmitting or paying net premiums to the insurer. For purposes of this paragraph, “controlling person” means any person who directly or indirectly has the power to direct the management, control or activities of the insurer;

The age of receivables and the ability to collect receivables;

The failure of an insurer’s management, including officers, directors, or any other person who directly or indirectly controls the operation of the insurer, to possess and demonstrate the competence, fitness and reputation necessary to serve the insurer in such position;

An insurer’s management’s failure to respond to inquiries relative to the condition of the insurer or an insurer’s management’s furnishing false and misleading information concerning an inquiry;

An insurer’s management’s:

Filing of any false or misleading sworn financial statement;

Release of false or misleading financial statements to lending institutions or to the general public; or

Making of a false or misleading entry, or omitting an entry of material amount in the books of the insurer.

An insurer’s rapid growth to such an extent that it lacks adequate financial and administrative capacity to meet its obligations in a timely manner;

An insurer’s past or foreseeable future experience of cash flow or liquidity problems;

Whether the insurer’s operating loss in the last twelve (12) month period or any shorter period of time, excluding net capital gains, is greater than twenty percent (20%) of the insurer’s remaining surplus as regards policyholders in excess of the minimum required;

Whether the insurer has failed to meet financial and holding company filing requirements in the absence of a reason satisfactory to the commissioner;

Whether management has established reserves that do not comply with minimum standards established by state insurance laws, regulations, statutory accounting standards, sound actuarial principles or standards of practice;

Whether management persistently engages in material underreserving that results in adverse development;

Whether transactions among affiliates, subsidiaries or controlling persons for which the insurer receives assets or capital gains, or both, do not provide sufficient value, liquidity or diversity to assure the insurer’s ability to meet its outstanding obligations as they mature;

Any other finding determined by the commissioner to be hazardous to the insurer’s policyholders, creditors or general public.

The standards set forth in subsection (c) of this section are in addition to those set forth in other laws or regulations of this state and shall not be construed to limit any other standards.

The commissioner, without advance notice or hearing, may immediately suspend the certificate of authority of any insurer as to which proceedings for receivership, conservatorship, rehabilitation or other delinquency proceedings have been commenced in any state by the public insurance supervisory official of that state.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 70, § 31; 1884, ch. 48, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 633; R.S. 1899, § 3185; C.S. 1910, § 4131; C.S. 1920, § 5275; R.S. 1931, § 57-432; C.S. 1945, § 52-1033; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-35, 26.1-65; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 65; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-120

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1992, ch. 59, § 2; 2012, ch. 38, §§ 2, 3.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in the introductory language of (c), added “creditors,” and “general”; added “audit reports and actuarial opinions, reports or summaries” in (c)(i); substituted “other financial analysis solvency tools and reports” for “related reports” in (c)(ii); repealed former (c)(iii), which read: “The ratios of commission expense, general insurance expense, policy benefits and reserve increases as to annual premium and net investment income which could lead to an impairment of capital and surplus”; rewrote (c)(iv); in (c)(vii), added “parent's, obligor's,” and added “and which in the opinion of the commissioner may affect the solvency of the insurer”; and added (c)(xvi) through (xxi).

Improper to grant injunctive relief requested by commissioner until parties' obligations ascertained. —

It would be improper to grant certain injunctive relief requested by the insurance commissioner, i.e., the direct payment of the tax debt of an unknown amount for certain years, the direct report of the proportion of the premiums collected on persons, subjects or risks located or resident in Wyoming and covered by policies in which such risks are in more than one state, and the payment of fines as civil penalties, where the obligation for the payment of such taxes has not been ascertained and the companies involved have not been requested to make the designated reports or pay the taxes. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Establishing the Tort of Bad Faith in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 625 (1985).

§ 26-3-117.
Suspension and revocation of certificate of authority; order and notice of suspension.

All suspensions or revocations of or refusals to continue an insurer’s certificate of authority shall be by the commissioner’s order given to the insurer.

Upon issuance of an order, the commissioner shall immediately give notice thereof to the insurer’s agents in this state of record in the department and shall suspend or revoke the authority of those agents to represent the insurer.

The commissioner shall publish notice of any suspension, revocation or refusal to continue in a newspaper in general circulation.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 70, § 31; 1884, ch. 48, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 633; R.S. 1899, § 3185; C.S. 1910, § 4131; C.S. 1920, § 5275; R.S. 1931, § 57-432; C.S. 1945, § 52-1033; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-35, 26.1-66; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 66; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-121

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.